New York, session 2025-2026, S4735.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "protect our schools act". 3 § 2. The civil rights law is amended by adding a new section 29 to 4 read as follows: 5 § 29. Immigration enforcement; protection in school settings. 1. A 6 person attending, employed at, or otherwise lawfully present at a public 7 or charter school, including students, parents, teachers and school 8 staff is privileged from immigration enforcement while in non-public 9 portions of school grounds or any property managed or operated by a 10 school district, unless the enforcement action is supported by a valid 11 court order or judicial warrant issued by an independent judge appointed 12 pursuant to Article III of the United States constitution or federal 13 magistrate judge appointed pursuant to 28 USC § 631 commanding the 14 arrest of such individual. 15 2. Administrative warrants, immigration detainers, and all other docu- 16 ments besides a valid court order or judicial warrant are insufficient 17 for immigration enforcement in non-public portions of school grounds. 18 3. It shall be considered unlawful and constitute unlawful imprison- 19 ment for any person to willfully violate this section by executing or 20 assisting in an arrest prohibited under this section, provided, however, 21 that nothing in this subdivision shall affect any right or defense of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09018-05-5 S. 4735--B 2 1 any person, school resource officer, police officer, peace officer or 2 public officer acting lawfully pursuant to their duty to maintain safety 3 in school settings. 4 4. A person whose rights under this section are violated or may be 5 violated may bring a civil action for equitable and declaratory relief 6 if such person has reasonable cause to believe a violation of this 7 section has occurred or may occur. Additionally, the attorney general 8 may bring a civil action in the name of the state to obtain appropriate 9 equitable and declaratory relief if the attorney general has reasonable 10 cause to believe a violation of this section has occurred or may occur. 11 5. Any successful action pursuant to this section may result in the 12 recovery of costs and reasonable attorney's fees. 13 6. As used in this section: 14 (a) "Administrative warrant" shall mean a warrant that is prepared and 15 issued by federal immigration authorities and directs federal officials 16 to arrest a noncitizen for removal or removal proceedings. 17 (b) "Immigration detainer" shall mean a request, typically issued by 18 federal immigration authorities to local law enforcement agencies, to 19 keep an individual in custody for up to forty-eight hours beyond when 20 the individual is scheduled for release. 21 (c) "Immigration enforcement" means the enforcement of any civil 22 provision of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act or any 23 provision of law that penalizes a person's presence in, entry into, or 24 reentry into the United States. 25 § 3. The education law is amended by adding a new section 409-o to 26 read as follows: 27 § 409-o. Authority of public and charter schools to maintain a safe 28 educational environment. 1. Public and charter school personnel shall 29 take appropriate action to prevent unauthorized law enforcement activity 30 on school grounds, to protect students' rights to a secure learning 31 environment. 32 2. All common, union free, central, central high school, city school 33 districts, boards of cooperative educational services, and charter 34 schools are prohibited from allowing law enforcement officials inside 35 school property to access a student or other person for immigration 36 enforcement or to inquire about citizenship, immigration status, nation- 37 ality, or country of origin, except to address an imminent safety situ- 38 ation or if they present a valid court order or judicial warrant issued 39 by an independent judge appointed pursuant to Article III of the United 40 States constitution or federal magistrate judge appointed pursuant to 28 41 USC § 631. 42 3. If presented with a valid court order or judicial warrant related 43 to immigration enforcement, before taking any other action, the school 44 personnel must ask for identification from any law enforcement officers 45 presenting a court order or judicial warrant and provide the school's 46 superintendent with the court order or judicial warrant, and such super- 47 intendent shall follow all protocols and guidance issued by the commis- 48 sioner related to an immigration enforcement action. 49 4. A school shall immediately notify the parent or guardian of the 50 student who is the subject of a court order or judicial warrant author- 51 izing an immigration enforcement arrest unless specifically prohibited 52 by such judicial warrant or court order. 53 5. No resources of any public or charter school shall be utilized for 54 immigration enforcement, including the time of school personnel and 55 school resource officers and use of school property. S. 4735--B 3 1 6. School personnel, including school resource officers, shall be 2 prohibited from disclosing student records containing immigration status 3 or related information to immigration authorities. 4 7. (a) The commissioner shall promulgate all rules and regulations 5 necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section, 6 including but not limited to, training for school personnel on handling 7 law enforcement requests, protocols for if law enforcement refuses to 8 identify themselves or disregards other school personnel efforts to 9 abide by this subdivision, and appropriate methods for notifying a 10 parent or guardian of a student who is the target of an immigration 11 enforcement action. 12 (b) The department shall publish an annual report on enforcement 13 actions affecting schools, detailing the number and nature of civil 14 arrests attempted or conducted on school premises and their outcome, as 15 well as all communications between immigration authorities and school 16 personnel and their content. 17 8. Public and charter schools shall publicly post information about 18 the rights of students, staff, and parents under the provisions of 19 this section, as well as other information related to immigration 20 enforcement in schools as deemed fit by the commissioner. 21 § 4. Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part 22 of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to 23 be invalid and after exhaustion of all further judicial review, the 24 judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder thereof, 25 but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, para- 26 graph, section or part of this act directly involved in the controversy 27 in which the judgment shall have been rendered. 28 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.